District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-514

Prohibited acts.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 15, 29 DCR 5297
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 10, 32 DCR 30
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184